Utah statutes.
16-16-813.   Meetings and notice.
(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may
establish a time, date, and place for regular board meetings, and notice of
the time, date, place, or purpose of those meetings is not required.
(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, notice of the time, date, and
place of a special meeting of a board of directors shall be given to all
directors at least three days before the meeting, the notice shall contain a
statement of the purpose of the meeting, and the meeting is limited to the
matters contained in the statement.
